Arkansas, session 2025, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 14, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-14-139. Unlawful creation or distribution of deepfake visual
material.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Deepfake visual material" means a photograph, image, video,
or other visual depiction that:
(A) Appears to an ordinary person to be an authentic
*CEB051*
04-07-2025 10:22:09 CEB051

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/7/25 HB1529
depiction of an identifiable person; and
(B) Is generated, modified, or adapted using technology to
falsely depict a person's appearance, voice, or conduct; and
(2) "Identifiable" means recognizable as a specific person by
the person's face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristics.
(b) A person commits the offense of unlawful creation or distribution
of deepfake visual material if he or she, without consent of the person
depicted, knowingly creates or distributes deepfake visual material that
depicts another identifiable person:
(1) In a state of nudity such that an ordinary person viewing
the deepfake visual material would conclude that the depiction is of the
identifiable person in a state of nudity; or
(2) Engaging in sexual contact, sexual intercourse, deviate
sexual activity, or sexually explicit conduct such that an ordinary person
viewing the deepfake visual material would conclude that the depiction is of
the identifiable person engaging in sexual contact, sexual intercourse,
deviate sexual activity, or sexually explicit conduct.
(c) Unlawful creation or distribution of deepfake visual material is:
(1) For a first offense, a Class A misdemeanor; and
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, a Class D felony.
(d) This section does not apply to a provider of, or affiliates of a
provider of, a telecommunication service, information service, or cable
service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153, for content provided by another
person.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 118, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
16-118-119. Civil action for unlawful creation of deepfake visual
material.
(a) The Attorney General may institute a civil action on behalf of the
state against a provider or developer of image generation technology that was
used to create deepfake visual material in violation of § 5-14-139 if:
(1) The deepfake visual material that was created in violation
of § 5-14-139 was generated substantially or in its entirety by a prompt-
based image generation technology; and
(2) The provider or developer of the image generation technology
04-07-2025 10:22:09 CEB051

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H4/7/25 HB1529
did not have reasonable safeguards in place to protect against the generation
of deepfake visual material.
(b)(1) A person injured or damaged by reason of a violation of § 5-14-
139 may bring a civil action against a person or entity that:
(A) Is the provider or developer of the image generation
technology that was used to create the deepfake visual material; or
(B) Caused or was responsible for the creation of deepfake
visual material in violation of § 5-14-139.
(2) The court may award actual damages, compensatory damages,
punitive damages, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate relief.
(3) A prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.

/s/S. Meeks






















04-07-2025 10:22:09 CEB051